Utah statutes.
58-79-302.   Qualifications for licensure.

(1)  An applicant for licensure as a hunting guide shall:

(a)  submit an application in a form prescribed by the division;

(b)  pay a fee determined by the department under Section 63J-1-504;

(c)  produce satisfactory evidence of good moral character;

(d)  possess a high degree of skill and ability as a hunting guide;

(e)  successfully complete basic education and training requirements established by rule by the division in collaboration with the board; and

(f)  meet with the division and board if requested by the division or board.

(2)  An applicant for licensure as an outfitter shall:

(a)  submit an application in a form prescribed by the division;

(b)  pay a fee determined by the department under Section 63J-1-504;

(c)  produce satisfactory evidence of good moral character;

(d)  possess a high degree of skill and ability as an outfitter;

(e)  successfully complete basic education and training requirements established by rule by the division in collaboration with the board; and

(f)  meet with the division and board if requested by the division or board.

